Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1906
Native American foster homes; legislative intent.

In order to achieve the goals and further the purposes of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 and the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, it is the intent of the Legislature that Native American families have the option to meet separate licensing standards for Native American foster homes located outside the boundaries of any Indian reservation or tribal service area as defined in section 43-1503.

Laws 1995, LB 451, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 475, § 4.

Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, see section 43-1501.